Washington statutes.
RCW 32.12.080

Misleading advertisement of surplus or guaranty fund.

No savings bank shall put forth any sign or notice or publish or circulate any advertisement or advertising literature upon which or in which it is stated that such savings bank has a surplus or guaranty fund other than as determined in the manner prescribed by law.

[ 1955 c 13 s 32.12.080. Prior: 1929 c 123 s 5; 1915 c 175 s 27; RRS s 3356.]